Vermont statutes. Title 13 Crimes and Criminal Procedure
Subchapter 1. Venue

§ 4601.
General rule.

When not otherwise provided, criminal causes shall be tried in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in the unit where an offense within the jurisdiction of such court is committed.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 118, § 7, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 101.

§ 4602.
When act in one county or unit causes death in another.

A person feloniously wounding or poisoning a person in one unit of the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, whose death results therefrom in another unit, may be tried in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in either unit, if the offense is within the jurisdiction of such court.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 118, § 8, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 1, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 101a.

§ 4603.
Offense on boundary.

If an offense is committed on the boundary of two or more units of the Superior Court, or within 100 rods of such boundary, such offense may be alleged in the information or indictment to have been committed and may be prosecuted in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in any of such counties or in the Criminal Division of the Superior Court in any of such units, if the offense is within the jurisdiction of such court.

HISTORY:

Amended 1973, No. 118, § 9, eff. Oct. 1, 1973; 1973, No. 193 (Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974; 2009, No. 154 (Adj. Sess.), § 101b.

§ 4604.
Repealed. 1969, No. 22, § 8.

§ 4605.
Repealed.
1973, No. 249 (Adj. Sess.), § 111, eff. April 9, 1974.